Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Rights and Obligations of Public Utilities Operating in Cities.

Sec. 42.30.010.
Use of streets and public places.

A person may not use the streets, alleys, or other public places of a city for public service except under AS

42.30.010

—

42.30.050

.
AS

42.30.010

—

42.30.050

do not apply to or affect a franchise granted before August 2, 1923, and may not be construed to legalize a franchise claimed to have been granted by a city.

History.

(§ 49-1-1 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 “city” was substituted for “municipality” in two places in this section. When this provision was enacted by sec. 43, ch. 97, SLA 1923, the only municipalities in Alaska were cities. See sec. 1, ch. 97, SLA 1923. Several related provisions enacted at the same time referred only to cities or to city councils. See, e.g., AS

42.30.030

and

42.30.040

. When the Alaska Statutes were codified in 1962, the term “city”’ should have been substituted for “municipality” to reflect the enactment of the borough laws in 1961. The 1989 change corrects this oversight.

Sec. 42.30.020.
Duty to serve without discrimination and adopt regulations.

Every person operating a public service plant or undertaking wholly or partially in a city for the furnishing of telephone service, water, power, lighterage, wharfage, dockage, storage, heat or light or kindred public service shall serve everybody alike without discrimination, and without denial, except for good and sufficient cause. Every person undertaking to supply this public service shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the conduct of the business and the operation of the public service plant. The rules and rates of charges for service shall be given fair and reasonable publicity.

A person operating a public service plant may not furnish the service cheaper than at rates lawfully established by charter, city ordinance, or otherwise, or grant or give a rebate from any sum due, owing, or earned for the service.

A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1000, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 49-1-3 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 “city” was substituted for “municipality” in (a) of this section to correct an oversight in the 1962 codification. See the revisor’s notes at AS

42.30.010

.

Sec. 42.30.030.
Books of account.

Every person installing, operating, or maintaining a public service plant for the purpose of supplying the city or the inhabitants of the city with telephone service, water, power, lighterage, wharfage, dockage, storage, heat, or light, or rendering other kindred public service shall keep correct books of account in permanent convenient form showing in detail the volume of business done, the character of the business done, the quantity and kind of service rendered, rates charged, and all expenses incurred in connection with the operation of the enterprise, showing the items of expense in detail. The books shall be open to inspection by the mayor and the city council and by an accredited agent, auditor, or representative appointed by the mayor and city council.

History.

(§ 49-1-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 173 SLA 1955; am § 93 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, inserted a comma following “heat” in the first sentence, and inserted a comma following “auditor” in the second sentence.

Sec. 42.30.040.
Annual statement.

During April of each year, each person engaged in furnishing a public service, except a rural electrification or telephone cooperative or nonprofit association receiving financial assistance from the federal government under 7 U.S.C. 901 — 918c (Rural Electrification Act), shall file with the city council a written statement under oath, sworn to by the person having the management and control of the business or other person familiar with all the facts. The statement must contain a detailed list of all property used in connection with the enterprise and give the valuation of each piece of property listed. It must also contain a statement of the receipts and disbursements during the year, and the profits or losses. The statement of disbursements must show to whom each item was paid and what for. The statement shall be for the calendar year preceding and shall be for the use of the city council.

The city council is not bound by the statement but may inquire into its truth.

History.

(§ 49-1-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 173 SLA 1955; am § 94 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For the Rural Electrification Act referred to in this section, see
7 U.S.C. 901 et seq.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “7 U.S.C. 901 – 918c (Rural Electrification Act)” for “the Rural Electrification Act”.

Sec. 42.30.050.
Penalty for failure to file annual report.

A person, firm, or corporation operating a public service plant or public utility, who wilfully fails, refuses, or neglects to file the report required by AS

42.30.040

within the time specified is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 49-1-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 173 SLA 1955)